Hawaii statutes.
D. Hawaii
Teacher Standards Board

Note

Subpart heading reenacted by L 2001, c 312, pt of §10.

Professional development schools grant program. L 2001, c
313.

§302A-801 Hawaii teacher standards board
established. (a) There is established the Hawaii teacher standards board,
which shall be placed within the department for administrative purposes only.
The board shall consist of fifteen members, including not less than six
licensed teachers regularly engaged in teaching at the time of the appointment,
three educational officers employed at the time of the appointment, the
chairperson of the board of education or the chairperson's designee, the
superintendent or the superintendent's designee, a representative of
independent schools, the dean of the University of Hawaii college of education
or the dean's designee; provided that one teacher member shall be engaged in
teaching at a Hawaii public charter school at the time of appointment and the
dean's designee shall be chosen from the member institutions of the teacher
education coordinating committee established under section 304A-1202, and two
members of the public.

(b) Except for the chairperson of the board of
education, superintendent, and dean of the college of education, the governor
shall appoint the members of the board pursuant to section 26-34, from a list
of qualified nominees submitted to the governor by the departments, agencies,
education stakeholder groups, and organizations representative of the
constituencies of the board; provided that the governor may request additional
names of qualified nominees from the departments, agencies, education
stakeholder groups, and organizations representative of the constituencies of
the board at any time. To the extent possible, the board membership shall
reflect a combination of abilities, breadth of experiences, and characteristics
that will best serve the diverse interests and needs of elementary and
secondary school personnel and the education system in Hawaii from early
childhood through higher education. Such considerations shall include but not
be limited to reflecting the diversity of the student population, geographical
representation, and a broad representation of education-related stakeholders.

(c) Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, appointed board members shall serve not more than three consecutive
three-year terms. Teacher and educational officer members who retire during a
term may serve the remainder of their current term.

(d) Board members shall receive no
compensation. When board duties require that a board member take leave of the
board member's duties as a state employee, the appropriate state department
shall allow the board member to be placed on administrative leave with pay and
shall provide substitutes, when necessary, to perform that board member's
duties. Board members shall be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses
incurred in the conduct of official board business.

(e) The chairperson of the board shall be
designated by the members of the board.

(f) The board may employ an executive director
for a term of up to four years, who shall be appointed by the board of
education without regard to chapters 76 and 89; provided that the board shall
submit a nominee to the board of education for approval or disapproval; provided
further that if the nominee is disapproved, the board shall submit another
nominee to the board of education for approval or disapproval.

The board may terminate the executive
director's contract for cause; provided that the board shall submit the recommendation
for termination to the board of education for approval or disapproval. [L 1996,
c 89, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 218, §3; am L 2001, c 312, pt of §10; am L 2006, c
75, §9; am L Sp 2009, c 2, §2; am L 2011, c 134, §1; am L 2014, c 39, §3]

Cross References

Definitions, see §302A-501.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next